Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.804

Exemption—Health profession board or commission—Professional opinions.

Members of a health profession board or commission as identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b) may express their professional opinions to an elected official about the work of the board or commission on which the member serves, even if those opinions differ from the department of health's official position. Such communication shall be to inform the elected official and not to lobby in support or opposition to any initiative to the legislature.

[ 2008 c 134 s 15.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.